Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3955
Board; meetings; minutes.

(1) The board shall meet at least once every six months at a time and place fixed by the board. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson and shall be called by the chairperson upon request of at least twenty-five percent of the members of the board. Written notice of the time and place of all meetings shall be mailed in advance to each member of the board. A majority of members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board shall be necessary for the adoption of rules and regulations.

(2) The board shall at each regular meeting review all expenditures made since its last regular meeting.

(3) The board shall keep minutes of its meetings and other books and records which shall clearly reflect all of the acts and transactions of the board. Such records shall be open to examination during normal business hours.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 8.